Utah statutes.
53A-15-102.   Early graduation incentives -- Incentive to school district --
Partial tuition scholarship for student -- Payments.
(1)  Any secondary public school student who has completed all required
courses or demonstrated mastery of required skills and competencies may, with
the approval of the student, the student's parent or guardian, and an
authorized local school official, graduate at any time.
(2)  Each public high school shall receive an amount equal to 1/2 of the
scholarship awarded to each student who graduates from the  school at or prior
to the conclusion of the eleventh grade, or a proportionately lesser amount
for any student who graduates after the conclusion of the eleventh grade but
prior to the conclusion of the twelfth grade.
(3) (a)  A student who graduates from high school at or prior to the
conclusion of the eleventh grade shall receive a centennial scholarship in the
lesser amount of full tuition for one year or $1,000 to be used for full time
enrollment at a Utah public college, university, community college, applied
technology center, or any other institution in the state of Utah, accredited
by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges that offers postsecondary
courses of the student's choice upon verification that the student has
registered at the institution during the fiscal year following graduation from
high school.
(b)  In the case of a student who graduates after the conclusion of the
eleventh grade but prior to the conclusion of the twelfth grade, the student
shall receive a centennial scholarship of a proportionately lesser amount.
(4) (a)  The payments authorized in Subsections (2) and (3)(a) shall be made
during the fiscal year that follows the student's graduation.
(b)  The payments authorized in Subsection (3)(b) may be made during the
fiscal year in which the student graduates or the fiscal year following the
student's graduation.
(5) (a)  The State Board of Education shall administer the payment program
authorized in Subsections (2), (3), and (4).
(b) (i)  The Legislature shall make an annual appropriation from the Uniform
School Fund to the State Board of Education for the costs associated with the
Centennial Scholarship Program based on the projected number of students who
will graduate before the conclusion of the twelfth grade in any given year.
(ii)  It is understood that the appropriation is offset by the state money
that would otherwise be required and appropriated for these students if they
were enrolled in an additional grade for a full year.
